 
 
I NEED SOME HELP IN UNDERSTANDING GERMANS.
 
 
When I think about Germans, this is what comes to mind:
*industrious, exact, masters of machines.
*responsible for much of WWI and the EurAsia part of WWII.
*Their economy tends to hold up Europe.
*a war-like people.
*blond hair and blue eyes.
*During the Cold War years, a split between the West and East work culture. Eastern Germans lost their industrious spirit under Communism.
*great composers.
*the arts
*the importance of the Black Forest.
*a love of nature.
*builders

To those of you who have lived in or near Germany or who have just visited the country, is any of what I have said true? Help me to understand the German people.
 
 
All Germans originally came from Scandanavia (which, as a continent, heaved a big sigh of relief when they'd gone). The rest of Europe intends to get Scandanavia for this, as soon as they figure out how to do it.

You ain't suckerin' me into another one of these...
 
 
 
 
steissd,
Interesting reference to France, I think this is the first time I have read it. Let's see how the others respond. Also, your posting may shred some light on the Frenchmen thread.
 
 
Absolutely home of the filthiest and most perverse porn.

If it has something to do with excrement, it's German.
 
 
By the way, this is one of the reasons that I have never liked France, long before Chirac's escapades on Iraqi issues. But I am almost sure that Mr. Hinteler will disagree with me on the role of France in electoral victory of the Nazis.
 
 
Well I've been to Germany a few times. Much of what you say M/L is true. They are industrious and economicaly quite well off.
They build good cars but I believe most of the shops are closed for much of the weekend. I prefer shops to cars.
They have given the world some very good music but I prefer the Blues and rock and roll to the likes of Wagner.
The Germans do not have a sence of humor that I've ever come across but they still have a bombastic attitude and expect others to do as they are told. They themselves are very obedient people.
I would much rather live on my higgledy piggeldy little island, with it's eccentric ways and our obstinance, than ever be a part of Germany. If dear old Walter finds this to be a little odd then I am sorry.
 
 
Don't make me put on the moustache and goosestep to 'Valderi, Valdera Valderahahahahahaha...' Love their sausages and beer, and perhaps their safe but sporty cars. And as for German porn, can I say essen die shieze? Forgive my spelling, I don't speak Visigoth, or any other barbaric language that requires the expulsion of phlegm   P.S., I am getting sucked in despite my truly friendly feelings for Walter...maybe Mapleleaf is actually chaos smurf, and not lazy smurf, as his avatar suggests  
 
 
Springtime for Hitler
And Germany...
Winter for Poland and France...

Don't be dumb, be a schmarty,
Come and join the Nazi party...
 
 
setanta,
Are you suggesting that Germans may have come from the same stock as the Vikings?
 
 
I refuse to answer on the grounds that it may tend to bore me...
 
 
I'm looking at a map, and I guess understanding the Poles must be next...
 
 
Or will it be Czechs?
 
 
Are all Eastern Europeans homonyms of English nouns?
 
 
 
setanta,
Are you suggesting that Germans may have come from the same stock as the Vikings?
 

They really got around, Mapleleaf. Do a quick google on Danes of Dublin.
 
 
blond hair and blue eyed? i don't think so. hamburger is about as german as it comes, and he had lovely thick black hair before it turned silver. his eyes are a grey-green. mrs. hamburger is also of german descent - dark brown hair and deep brown eyes.

germans have a wild sense of humour, but it's a bit hmmmmm subtle, and has a lot of basis in the use or misuse of language.

the economy is not doing very well there these days - at least not in comparison to Canada. perhaps hamburger will drop by and talk about his impressions of the country as he found it a month or so ago.

the importance of the black forest? to who? not to most germans. maybe to lovers of cuckoo clocks. hmmmmmm, don't think i've ever seen a cuckoo clock in anyone's home while i was in germany. i'd have noticed something that annoying.

If i was responding straight out (without seeing anyone's comments), I'd definitely focus on the bizarre sense of humour i've discovered in most Germans. Oh, and the prices. The prices of things are insane there - and the quality of things other than cars made in Germany have never impressed me.

The food's very good. Very very good.
 
 
Course not Patiodog. Didn't you ever hear of Hungary?

oopsie
 
 
 
germans have a wild sense of humour, but it's a bit hmmmmm subtle, and has a lot of basis in the use or misuse of language.
 

I'll let that one go, suffice to say that i ain't convinced...

 
to who?
 

whom... that there is the objective...

 
and the quality of things other than cars made in Germany have never impressed me.
 

has never impressed me... that there predicate nominative is singular: "the quality of things"

 
The food's very good. Very very good.
 

I'm gonna let that one go, too... i'm already in enough trouble now...

Hi Lovey... how ya doin?
 
 
I like to drink in Munich. Heidelberg's got a very nice river to camp next to. Bremen is frightening.

There. That's what I have to say about Germany.
 
 
As for the subtelties of German humour, I suppose it is because the punchline comes at the beginning, and the explanation at the end...can Mapleleaf get off this little thingy of his now?
 
 
 
...can Mapleleaf get off this little thingy of his now?
 

I need some help in understanding the above. Me head is short of a full load of sawdust.
 
 
Go to Germany. Tell people, "I'm here for help in understanding Germans."

It will be an excellent opportunity to determine whether there is a native sense of humor. If there isn't, they should be helpful.
 
 
I once read the war memoirs of the man who ended the war as number three on the list of RAF fighter aces... had he not been shot down, he might have lead the list. He recounted how his engine had been put out of commission in a dog-fight in which he had nonetheless managed to shoot down his opponent. This was over northern France, and he hoped he could coast to the Channel, where he could hope to be picked up. When it became clear to him that he wouldn't make it, he bagan to look for a field to put down in. He had found one, but as he got closer, he realized that there was a mobile FLAK unit there, and he had insufficient speed to pull up his nose and maneoevre. The cannon rounds were coming closer and closer, so, having no choice as he saw it, he returned fire with his cannon (he was at that time flying a Hawker Typhoon with a 30 mm cannon in the nose). Finally, he "pancaked" into the field, made soft by recently having been plowed, and survived the crash.

German infantry ran up and made him prisoner. They dragged him out of the cockpit, pushed him to the ground several times, moved him forward by frequently slapping him on the back of the head, and marched him over to the the FLAK truck. There, one of the four cannon barrels was split open with the metal curled back like the petals of a flower. He had put a cannon round directly down the barrel of the gun, and the resulting explosion had killed the gun crew, who were still sitting dead, strapped in their seats.

He was pretty sure he was a goner at this point, when the Germans burst into loud guffaws, telling him, more or less, "Oh you should have seen your face... i bet you thought you were a dead man now, huh ! ! !" He said they laughed uproariously for quite some time, and the German officer who was translating for him had some difficulty, because he was laughing himself. Then they grew very serious, and congratulated him on his good shooting, saying how impressed they were with how he had pulled it off while gliding in a heavy aircraft with no power...

This anecdote has always been for me, the epitome of German humor... crude, cruel, and basically dull-witted...
 
 
germans are pretty much the same as frenchmen, dutchmen and swedes, just with an oddity here and there.

within germany, differences between people will be bigger (both from person to person and from region to region) than between any of them and a random belgian or czech. i.e., a bavarian will be more like an austrian than like someone from schleswig-holstein, who'll be more like a dane than... etc.

same as anywhere else, i'd venture.

you'll have little luck "understanding germans" if you try to do it by defining "what germans are like". best you're likely to end up with is a plethora of stereotypes. see your first post.

there, i went on thread with it this time.

"understanding germany" (instead of "germans") would at least conceptually be more valid a question, though you'd still have to be more specific for me to be "able 2 know" anything...
 
 
I might suggest taking a trip to Alsace and asking them about their German roots and heritage.
 
 
 
... Then they grew very serious, and congratulated him on his good shooting, saying how impressed they were with how he had pulled it off while gliding in a heavy aircraft with no power...

This anecdote has always been for me, the epitome of German humor... crude, cruel, and basically dull-witted...
 

I do not understand your interpretation of this. I was fully expecting you to say "Appreciative of technical competence, accurate, principled, disciplined yet with human amusement. Without vengeance."

An American would have "liberated" the pilots soul,
and then demanded some kind of fee for the service.
 
 
Setanta

re humour:
Not a real anecdote, published (by local historians) and re-told by a well-respected man - at least for me, since it has been my father:

two days after my parent's marriage, my hometown became the very most eastern point of the "Ruhr-Kessel".
My father did a hell of a job, painting red crosses on the hospital and home for metally ill and trying to make a the surrender of that small town able without too many deaths or wounded.
He did so, because he thaught to be the only officer there - he was a a doctor in the medical corps with non-conbattant-status.

The Americans shot three times at him, wounding him just slightly.

He was taken POW and carried about a week around here (there were still some minor fightings going on).

Then, a group of about a dozen, all of non-conbattant-status, POW's were taken to the small village of Ahden. Each got a spade, they had to dig a whole of the seize of a grave, knee in front of it and then six maschine-guns were installed.
They were asked to do a last praying, the shooting command went behind the guns... and then all Americans were laughing.

My father never went to this village in his life, even when he was acting as that county's medical officer later.
 
 
I do think, Germans have humour as well, certainly different to other's nationalty ones.

I do not think that you'll find a 'general line' to characterize 'the Germans' - besides in football, where we have really a rotten team.

I'm following this thread with quite some interest - perhaps it will help me as well.
 
 
I believe that Germans are exactly  just like Latvians  except only, you know... German.
 
 
I like Germany and the Germans. Unusual for a Brit, but then I've spent several months of my life there and speak the language.

Forget national stereotypes for looks - yes, Claudia Schiffer is typically German, but very few Germans look like her!

I'll give two views for now. One comes from a programme I saw recently on the 50 years of formal, peaceful engagement between Germany and France. Various people from each country, often living in the other, were asked to give their views. The one which stuck with me was:

Germans sit in bars and grumble (quatchen) about the state of the world, how the environment is in a terrible way, the prices are going up, etc....so the bars are full of long faces, talking about the serious matters of life.

The French sit in cafes and shrug their shoulders at the state of the world. They all know it's in a terrible state, so why not party tonight as if we'll all die tomorrow...have fun at all costs!

OK - it's an extreme dichotomy, not true across the board, but it does give an impression of the difference in attitude. We Brits, of course, like to see the irony in everything and therefore generate our own black humour in such situations!

My other observation is based on something I picked up from a (tiny) introduction to Wittgenstein, who claimed that languages influence the way in which we think. German is a very structured language, which requires the whole sentence to be planned before it is delivered. This can lead to writing which is very difficult to understand without concentration (for a non-native), e.g. putting a whole qualifying phrase before the noun which it qualifies. This is a rather archaeic or formal way of writing, but it comes as no surprise to me that there have been so many philosophers, psychologists and sociologists with German as their mother tongue. The language lends itself to rational, philosophical discussion of ideas. Goethe said: "When words fail, ideas come in very useful".
 
 
Sure Walter, i'll give you that. Nobody has a corner on crude, cruel and dull-witted humor.

Forgive me Boss, i grew up in a small town which had a Protestant majority of largely German descent. There was a constant sniping back and forth between the Catholic and Protestant children, and our History teacher used to stand at the head of the class and proclaim in all seriousness the glory and superiority of Hitler and the Nazi regime, and the racial superiority of the Germans. Has kind of left a sour taste in my mouth over the last 50 years.
 
 
Setanta

Forgiven :wink:

I grew up in a small town (14,000 at that) as well.

I know of the rivality between Catholics and Protestants - we, however, had an even stronger to the other Catholic parish.
 
 
Well, as a German I feel I have to say something on this thread. The first thing that comes to my mind is 'No, I am not blond and blue-eyed.' (As you very well know, Mapleleaf!)

I like Kitchenpete's story about the Germans and the French. I think you are right. Germans tend to see things in a negative way.

And yes, the stores are closed most of the weekend. They just changed the law, however, and stores will be allowed to be open until 8 pm on Saturdays. So there - we are able to change.

Sense of humour? Oh come on - of course we have a sense of humour. And of course it is different - we are, after all, Germans.

Cars - yes, the cars! I drive an Italian car, BTW.

I will not go into any political or historical details. Walter can do that a lot better than me.
 
 
Really, Walter, that was unconscionable treatment of POWs.
 
 
That Swabian land I will not bear
And dresses long I shall not wear
For dresses long and pointed shoes
Are clothes a chambermaid should never choose
 
 
I do not think that national character can be reduced to language. My late father was an ethnic German that was born and died in the USSR, and he did not know the language. Neither do I. Neither him nor me have ever been in Germany. BTW, none of us was blond, but my eyes are gray-to-blue despite of the dark brown color of all the realtives from the mother's side that are Jews.
But many features of the stereotype that appeared in the postings of different members are characteristic to me. Regarding the story of the RAF pilot, I think, my response in the similar situation would be just the same (if I did not get an order to act another way, of course).
 
 
pete - great observation about the germans and french. <nods> I think, actually - that's one of the better ways to get to know the character of a country's people - by comparing it with the character of another country's (and really, I don't mean your own).

I've known a few germans, and I can say they'd be about as hard to stick in a box as the any random group of americans I know.

and I have to comment on the RAF pilot story, too - I think those guys responded like any group of "healthy" (ahem) boys would in the field, at war - even HEALTHIER than some would - of any nationality.

stasia

(there's a french thread, too? <g> I hate France.)
 
 
urs53 - in holland, most shops close at 6 every day, except saturday, when they close at 5. I miss 24-hour america sometimes.
 
 
24-hour America? Not everywhere, A. I still can't get used to this 9:00 closing (on the weekends!) for liquor stores in WA...
 
 
Anastasia, huh? So you made it outta that cellar in Yekaterinaburg alive, huh? Gosh, you sure look good for a woman more'n a hundred years old... what's yer secret?
 
 
Liquor stores close at nine ? ! ? ! ? That is tragic. For many of us in certain socio-economic groups, the liquor store functions as an ATM, provided we haven't been obliged to pawn the Smith & Wesson recently...
 
 
Yekaterinburg??? It is not in Germany, it is in Russia, some 3-4 thousand kilometers East from the easternmost point of Germany (I mean the modern FRG, and not the country in its 1914 borders). Well, the Empress Catherine the Great ( born Sophia Augusta von Anhalt-Zerbst) that the city was named after, was 100 percent German, but the people of this city are mainly Russians.
 
 
I smoke a pack a day. <g>

patiodog - I lived in SC for a while - no alchohol on sundays!
 
 
that was an "anastasia" reference, stissd. <giggles>
 
 
steissd. <blush>
 
 
... trying hard to get of the box... <grins>
 
 
Is <grins> a sign of humour, patiodog? Deleted!
 
 
Steissd, this gets tedious sometimes. It might help if you assume that almost everything i write is NOT serious, unless there is uncontrovertable textual evidence to the contrary.

Anastasia was the name of one of the daughters of the last Romanov Emperor, Nicholas II. He and the whole crew were murdered in a cellar in Yekaterinburg. However, for many decades after, various claims were made that Anastasia had escaped, including one Russian woman in Paris who dined out for more than a generation on the basis of a claim to be Anastasia.

So, this was just humor...

Stasia, the fact that you tripped to the joke immediately leads me to accord you great respect for both intelligence and a well-developed sense of humor...

No offense is intended toward you Steissd, but we really need to work on you recognizing irony and humor...
 
 
beer and wine on sundays. no hard liquor. (oh, god, the hardship i live with!)

germans, by the way, have beer in vending machines, which i think is very civilized. (i seem to remember the same at a gas station in tuscany, but of course the beer is not as good.)
 
 
Ah, Setanta, I surely know that the Emperor and his family were executed in Yekaterinburg. But I thought that you have confused this city with some place in Germany (Brandenburg, for example), since its name really sounds German. Hence, my posting.
 
 
setanta - I'm a glutton for attention - that's all. <giggles>
 
 
requested a gluten-free meal for somebody at a conference once. the invoice showed a "glutton-free" meal. god, i hope they gave her something to eat.
 
 
LMAO! serious?
 
 
anastasia: <-- also known to be gullible
 
 
her allergy? yes, i suspect so. the misspelling? yes, that as well.
 
 
mapleleaf, I am *still* curious how the industriousness of east germans changed under communism.

fer serious
 
 
If i ordered a glutton free meal, they'd throw me outta the joint...
 
 
Anastasia,
Under Communist rule in East Berlin, Germans were assured a wage regardless of their efforts. During their state sponsered work sessions, it became commonplace for them to gather, smoke and talk. Little was accomplished. Present day Americans would equate it to a well honed welfare society.

Some years back, I read about the situation. After the fall of the wall, I don't know how the West Berliners integrated them back into the work force.
 
 
I've heard about that in communist societies - stories about clerical workers and stuff.

I can see how one might equate that with a lack of industrious spirit. <nods>

East Germans were very industrious in the sports sector (for example) - I hear. And I would imagine that they expressed their (kind of inate, it seems, going by stereotypes) in other ways. For example, thinking of ways to escape from East Berlin. <g> But yeah - I can see how, specifically regarding work culture - that conclusion can be drawn.

(these are just personal observations, I haven't taken the time to form opinions. <winks>)

stasia
 
 
Mapleleaf,

The quick answer to how the East German workforce was re-integrated is: it wasn't!

German unemployment is currently running at around 8% (from memory). However, close to the Polish border in former East Germany, some towns have nearly 90% unemployment.

Given the welfare system in place, this causes huge strains on the German economy, which is underperforming other European nations and is therefore close to breaching the terms of the single currency agreement on fiscal deficit.

For more economic/employment data, etc. I suggest you go to the following website:

 http://www.economist.com/countries/Germany/ 

Some content is available only to subscribers, but the factsheets and general data is available to all. If there's a particular article of interest which is subscription only, please pm me.

KP
 
 
So I guess the moral would be... "If it ain't broke, don't fix it"?

<waaaaay innocennt face>
 
 
Well, you are correct, all, including The Economist.

However, you'll find not only close to the Polish border towns with great unemloyment (not 90%, about 30, officially - East compared to West is 19.1% to 8.8, last month's figures.)
This is mainly due to the fact that the old industrial plants weren't effective any more - those I saw, could have been from 1938 or so.
 
 
Has there been a lot of migration inside Germany, Walter?
 
 
Yes, about 20% (perhaps now more, couldn't find actual numbers) of East Germans settled in the West.

And a great number is working in western states, with their (east) firms.
An even greater number is driving daily/weekly to West German working places, especially from the former "border countries".
 
 
How are Germans especially different, from other countries?
Some  interesting statistics are here , but if you find others, please let me know...
 
 
germany vs america
The Germans have a 12 year history of genocide but have historically produced more geniuses in literature, philosophy, music, mathematics and science than about any country you could name.

America has a 200+ year history of genocide and has produced no one of any note.

America should be destroyed as a matter of global hygiene.
 
 
 
The Germans have a 12 year history of genocide but have historically produced more geniuses in literature, philosophy, music, mathematics and science than about any country you could name.

America has a 200+ year history of genocide and has produced no one of any note.

America should be destroyed as a matter of global hygiene.

 

First of all, I would not accuse Germany and German people in genocide, I would readress these accusations to a particular political party, namely NSDAP. Many of the people that gave their vote to Hitler did this since they supported his economic program and not racial theories. When he established the totalitarianstate, it became impossible to remove him without help from outside.
I would not accuse the USA in genocide either. The feud with Indians took place in 18th-19th centuries, and at that time there were another rules of making war, and the term "the war crime" has not been introduced. I also heard about numerous instances of torture, killing and other types of mistreatment of the U.S. POWs by Indians.
I would not either deny American contribution to science and technology. Even the PC that you used for denigrating the USA is the American invention. Add to this incandescent bulb, telephone, polyo vaccine, deciphering of the DNA code (in co-authorship with the British scientists), description of the human genome, even Viagra®...
I wonder, Mr. Green, whether you are an American. If you are the one, why do not you consider changing both citizenship and residence? You hate your country so much that you call for its destruction. I heard that such people are welcome in North Korea and Iran...
If you are not an American, IMO, you should take into consideration that majority of the veteran members of this forum, including its founding dads and mums, are. Some of them are critical toward the current administartion, but none of them is a hater of their country. Have you taken into consideration their feelings?
 
 
Yes, that was quite an opener, henrygreen.

It is the only intemperate post among dozens on a good-humoured and thoughtful thread.

McT
 
 
Walter, I'm sure the migration of eastern Germans have exacerbated the unemployment problem in Germany to its current levels, but the primary culprit for unemployment all around the globe has been the tech bust and overall global economic downturn beginning with 9-11, the Gulf War, and SARS. What is the "official" and "actual" unemployment in Germany today? c.i.
 
 
Were one interested in knowing where the Germans came from, and who they became in western Europe 1500 years ago, i would recommend a paper back in which the lectures of J.M. Barry are collected, he was the authority on Germans in late Imperial and early Gothic times in his lifetime. I went to the Library of Congress for a citation, but the name is too common, and the subject... "The Germans"... too vast for me to have tracked him down without hours or days of searching. I'll see if can get a citation for y'all...

But the point i would make is that, in terms of descent, Germans are present in Italy, France, Spain, and North Africa from 1500 years ago and more, in addition to the central European home ground one would tend to think of immediately. There is almost no nation of Europe without a German admixture to a greater or lesser extent... yeah, Henrygreen, them 'Mericans is a bunch a pea-wits, too bad they can't be all cool an' stuff, like them Europeens.
 
 
America has an obsession with Hitler. We have to mention Hitler 25,000 per day because if we don't, we will have to deal with the REALLY scary Germans: Goethe, Bach, Wagner, Heisenberg, Nietzsche, Rilke, Beethoven....a mile long list of names, the LEAST of whom so utterly eclipse anything produced in America as to make the true dimensions of our defective septic tank appallingly plain.

As to America's conduct in the world, humanity has just about had it and will no longer stick up for the murderers of 3 million Vietnamese, the destroyers of Afghanistan and Iraq...this rogue state which has advertised its distain for all international law--a worthless pigsty whose primary contribution to mankind remains napalm.

One can defend human rights, human dignity, international law, regard for the natural environment...OR one can defend the United States. You can not defend both.

Anti-Americanism is a moral imperative. It is nothing to hide but rather something for decent, caring people to take personal pride in.
 
 
By the way, the thread is about Germany and not the USA, is not it?
Sorry for having responded to the first U.S.-related publication of Mr. Green, but I was so angry with its contents that I could not remain silent.
And regarding Beethoven, Bach, von Göthe, Wagner and other titans of the German culture and their comparison to the U.S. achievements: there are high art and pop culture in every nation, and if you make a deeper search, you will find outstanding people in the U.S. literature, art and music as well. Some good will is needed for searching for the positive sides...
 
 
Re: I NEED SOME HELP IN UNDERSTANDING GERMANS.
Okay, Mapleleaf, let me go through your list.

 
*industrious, exact, masters of machines.
 

I'd say it's mostly true, and it maybe one reason why German businesspeople have found it hard to develop attitudes that are helpful in the service industry.

 
*responsible for much of WWI and the EurAsia part of WWII.
 

True, except that Germany was "only" responsible for the European part of World War II. The Japanese are the ones responsible for the Asian part.

 
*Their economy tends to hold up Europe.
 

Walter would know how true this was before the Iron Curtain fell. Since then, after a brief Reunification boom, Germany has rather dragged the European economy down.

 
*a war-like people.
 

True from about 1910 to 1945. Not true before and after.

 
*blond hair and blue eyes.
 

That was the Nazi ideal, but it is definitely far from true. Note how hard it is to find a blond haired man even among the top Nazis -- I couldn't think of any from the top of my head.

 
*During the Cold War years, a split between the West and East work culture. Eastern Germans lost their industrious spirit under Communism.
 

Everyone looses their industrious spirit under Communism. The interesting observation was that productivity in West Germany was the highest in Western Europe, and productivity in East Germany was the highest in Eastern Europe. This indicates there was something about Germans that persisted under the different economic systems.

 
*great composers.
 

That was true in the 18th and 19th century. I'm not sure it was true in the 20th.

 
*the arts
 

are held in high esteem, and are probably more highly subsidized in Germany than anywhere else in the free world. This is certainly good for artists -- whether it is good for art is another question. My impression is that American artists, while poorer, tend to be more creative.

 
*the importance of the Black Forest.
 

Practically nil outside the Black Forest itself. It's mostly a wicked scheme to attract American tourists to the Black Forest.

 
*a love of nature
 

Who doesn't love nature? However, the Green movement got into parliament in Germany earlier than elsewhere in Europe

 
*builders
 

Neither more nor less true than for any European country.

-- Thomas
 
 
Good will and a lot of imagination.

If there was any justification for destroying Germany in order to put an end to its murderous onslaught, there is today far greater justification for putting an end to the United States before it has a chance to drive the species extinct, as it seems quite intent on doing.
 
 
There was no justification for destroying Germany; but replacement of Hitler was fully justified. Unfortunately, this was impossible without destruction of this great country: German military were much more efficient and motivated than the Iraqi ones.
 
 
Henrygreen's vituperative and hateful post is predicated upon the two assumptions that it is justified to both ignore Americans of genius in arts and sciences, and to equate the significantly unpopular actions of a single executive administration with the entirety of the United States--by which he cannot help but mean the entire population, for whatever protestations he may make to contrary.

So i will quote for him one of the citizens of this nation which he admires so much, and warn him that his hatred is consuming him:

"He who would fight monsters should look to that he does not become a monster himself... when you gaze long into the abyss, the abyss gazes into you... "

F. Neitzsche
 
 
There is nothing wrong in admiring Germany, it deserves admiration for lots of reasons. But this must not be combined with hatred toward the other democratic civilized nations.
 
 
henrygreen's opinion are... well, somewhat peculiar.

c.i.

Very seldom it is explained that German numbers of unimployment exist of any person without employment and officially looking for one - no matter, how long this may have been. (For example, my wife is among that number, now 8 years without work - some 100,000 are above 58 years old and just 'waiting' for their pensions...)

The official figures for last month (April) are:
Germany totally: 10.8% (West: 8.6%, East: 19.1%)

This mades in EU-standard 9.4% for all Germany.
 
 
Germany's astounding contributions in no way mitigate the horrors it imposed on Europe's Jews. By what feat of madness is America--this mediocre backwater of no significance, to be excused for 200 years of slaughter and cruelty? I'm all ears.
 
 
Yes, i'm sure you would be happy to set the terms and definitions of such a diatribe-based argument in advance... rather in the "Have you stopped beating your wife" category of a priori bases for argument... i cannot help but find your venom hillarious, though: "backwater of no significance" just rocks... ah me, i love hyperbole, but the more so when the author doesn't even understand the joke... you know, were this a backwater of no significance, it certainly could not pose the threat to the world which you alleged. You need to work these contraditions out of your dogma before you begin the life-long chore of foisting it off upon the incredulous and bored...
 
 
One thing I like about Germany is the potato salad.
There are several different kinds of potato salad, as I learned at the Goethe-Institut, and all of them seem to be equally delicious: they were made by the ladies of the group for the end-of-term parties.
In Hamburg, in my youth, I enjoyed Bratwurst mit Kartoffelsalat from the street stalls, and that memory remains as a taste of an exotic foreign land.
 
 
10.8 percent of unemployment? We have the same level in Israel, and government refers to it as to a national disaster...Well, it took to me two long months to find a new job: almost no interesting job offers appear in the classifieds of the media... Is the situation in the FRG the same, and people that have lost job cannot find it so much time?
 
 
There are no jobs, that's it, not only "no interesting jobs".

Well, somehow, at least.

I can't compare it with Israel, since I don't know the Israelian situation well enough.
 
 
No contradiction at all. There is nothing terribly sophisticated or noteworthy about endoparasites, yet (like the united states) they are responsible for widespread death and misery.

From a cultural standpoint, America is every bit as much a "backwater" as the most remote, feces-strewn pit on earth. The fact that it has devoted the bulk of its considerable wealth to developing more sophisticated means of slaughtering other people changes this fact not one iota.
 
 
Thanks for the compliment for my wife and me, henrygreen.
 
 
Henrygreen,
You should start an American thread of your own to advance these ideas, and garner comment from those who would disagree with you.
Of whom there would be many, I'm sure.

McT
 
 
Henrygreen -- Welcome to A2K! :-) I am enjoying your posts very much... Thank you for sharing your ideas and beliefs.

I couldn't help notice that they seem more directed at Americans than about Germany, though. Sounds like you've been doing a lot of thinking about it... perhaps the topic is worth a discussion thread about America, similar to these ones about Gemany, France, Latvia, and Ireland?

If you (or anyone) starts such a topic, I for one would definitely read it with great interest... especially to understand various examples, and think about ways of improving the world!
 
 
I doubt if your strategies to get him to go away will do much good, he's eaten up with this hateful obsession. I'd suggest that the best way to deal with this irrational hatred is to ignore him. That's why i've not replied to his latest nonsense, and intend to reply to him no longer.
 
 
Germans cant, they really really cant, dance.

Love their beer and cars though....
 
 
Not sure why Setana bothers listening to ANYONE, having "spent a lifetime accumulating sufficient information on history, human nature, philosophy, art, spirituality--and all things necessary to live one's life well, making the best choices" as his fatuous bio informs us.

A discussion of Germany would be incomplete without a review of National Socialism, a hateful and destructive ideology which the United States seems bent on copying and indeed, extending in its quest for dominion over the planet. I find the incessant suggestion that Germany must atone for its sins of 50 years ago alongside the blank check for American abominations to be one of the most effective historical snowjobs in all of human history and therefore a more than worthy topic. As others here disagree, I'm happy to leave the forum to discussions of employment data and more mundane fare.
 
 
Gautam, Who can argue with that? Their cars and beers are top rate, but so is their sausages.   c.i.
 
 
Oh I am a veggie - cant comment on the sausages <he says with an innocent look>
 
 
um... we didn't destroy germany. germany came back just fine. they just have a roller-coaster employment rate, like the rest of the world.

also... yeah - I was right with you, in your anger, until you went to that low point - just because you hate america (and I think you must be american) - you shouldn't resort to pointless (and misguided) namecalling - and by that I mean "backwater of no significance"... it's just not true. so I was feeling your anger - and I'm happy to hear someone say these things, actually... but it rather reminds me of this video I saw the other day...

I went to this exposition of Marina Abramavic's work in Amsterdam. There was a video called "dissolution"... in it, marina is sitting on her calves, with her back to the camera. she's got black pants on, but no shirt. there is no set dressing. for about 15 minutes, she flagellated herself on the back with a cat o'nine tails.

She's ashamed of Serbian actions with regard to their neighbors. Maybe some other things, too.
 
 
 
Not sure why Setana bothers listening to ANYONE, having "spent a lifetime accumulating sufficient information on history, human nature, philosophy, art, spirituality--and all things necessary to live one's life well, making the best choices" as his fatuous bio informs us.
 

That "profile" was ironic sarcasm, which is recognized by all here who know me, as many here do--it was not written in seriousness, and is not to be taken seriously. Your use of the word "fatuous" shows that you are willing to use personal slurs when your arguments fail. This does not surprise me coming from such an unreasoning fanatic. I won't respond to your nonsensical contentions directly, and certainly not when you resort to personal invective. I am going to post a refutation of your claptrap, because i was dismayed to see people describe what you've written as "interesting."
 
 
Wagner was a Nazi and his operas are long-winded and pretentious. He also wore women's panties. Give me good heroin-induced jazz (Germans suck at jazz too) any day....America may have it's backwaters, but at least those backwaters have cool, broken down rusty cars on the lawn to look at.
 
 
I have written that i will not respond to Henrygreen again, and i will not. However, it has been written here that one of our number found what he wrote interesting, and worthy of discussion. I could not have been more surprised and dismayed. I can only describe what he has written here as interesting in the same sense that any other pathological example of obsession can be said to provide a sort of horrified fascination. What he has written is predicated upon a series of statements by him about history and culture which one would have to take as a priori bases for discussion if one were to argue these points with him-and in so doing, would lend a credence to his wildly inaccurate statements which is undeserved, and would place his disputant at an immediate disadvantage. This is what i meant about a "have you stopped beating your wife" style of debate, in that to answer such a question, one is first obliged to acknowledged having beaten one's wife in the past. To answer Henrygreen's ridiculous contentions through debate on the heads of discussion he has outlined would be to accord to his arguments a possibility of validity which is not deserved. So i will address his points in detail-not because i give a tinker's damn what Henrygreen thinks-his mind is obviously poisoned, and likely beyond any definition of redemption. But i would be appalled to think that any intelligent person might read what he writes and consider such tommyrot worthy of serious consideration. In this discussion, i consider, as always, that the modern nations of the Americas are European nations, and that in a discussion of Germans, the Austrians are included-throughout most of European history, they are included in the definition of Germans, as well they ought. I will begin with his absurd contention that Germany is browbeaten for a single, 12-year episode in their history. Germany is well-respected in the international community, and so they ought to be; there are certainly many who do not wish them to forget their Nazi past, but, then, they seemed determined themselves not to forget it. This past does not haunt Germany in its international relations, for however it may cause them anguish at home. Of course, as in the case of all of his contentions, Henrygreen does not provide any examples of this, or evidence for the statement. This leaves us with the contention about 12 years of Hitler and it's effect.

In 1918, the Allies, bolstered by the growing American Armies, had fended off Ludendorf's spring offensive, and began planning for and building up forces for a counteroffensive. This plan had the Anglo-Belgian army and l'Armée du Nord swinging wide upon a "hinge" provided by the Americans to drive the Germans from northern France and Belgium. It assumed a rather mediocre performance by the Americans. The Americans immediately disappointed this expectation-for example, the 43rd Division, the "Rainbow Division," was to have taken Sedan within one week. Lead by the Acting Division Commander, Douglas MacArthur, they reached Sedan in a little more than two days. The other American forces performed just as well. The Allied plan had envisioned pushing the Germans back to their border, to provide a better negotiating position at the conclusion of the war. But the unexpected fury of the American drive surprised their allies, and panicked the Germans. Ludendorf, a military opportunist and pervericator of limitless dimensions, convinced the Prussian imperial authorities that if they did not negotiate immediately, the Army would be cut off and rounded up. This was very clever of him, as it allowed first him, and later many others, including Hitler, to claim that the Army had been prepared to fight on, but were betrayed by the government.

This is all significant because of what ensued. Socialists in Germany, where the Socialists had been the most well-organized of all European Socialist parties before the war, launched a bloody rebellion, with a good deal of support from the High Seas Fleet, in which their recruiters had enjoyed a good deal of support, and where many Socialists had served during the war. With an armistice in place, Ludendorf was able to rush regiments from the west to put down this revolt. With Ludendorf losing his mental grip, he was not useful as a figure-head for any party in Germany, as Hitler learned to his dismay, but his fairy tales about the army's performance in the late war stood many demagogues in good stead. After the street fighting in 1918, groups of unemployed veterans of the war were organized according to their political views into gangs of street thugs to intimidate or to actually assault their opponents. While Hitler was languishing in prison after his failed "Beer Hall Putsch," the most successful of these, Ernst Rohm, was building his organization, popularly known as the "Brown Shirts," after the paramilitary garb they wore. Rohm was a very canny gutter politician. He put up a facade of social welfare-soup kitchens and make-work projects for the unemployed-over the darker elements of his program, which included a heavy streak of anti-semitism. After Hilter got out of prison, he allied himself to Rohm, eventually incorporating Rohm's organization into his party. His party was the National German Workers' Party, and used the same veneer of socialist welfare-but Hitler could be very charming at need, and he received large scale monetary support from German businessmen and industrialists who were favorably impressed with the Fascists' policies in Italy. This allowed him to set up soup kitchens and pass out bread right across Germany, and to pressure the Weimar Republic into public works programs to provide employment. This gave him a national base. When his ploy to make the Socialists the boogey man with the suspicious Riechstadt fire did not produce the results he wanted, he took a page from Rohm's book, and focused his political distractions on the Jews. The evil effects of Rohm and Hitler began well before Hitler took the Chancellery in 1933, and the effects lasted well beyond Hitler's death in 1945. Speaking of "12 years" is very disingenuous, and willfully ignores the scope of the evil loosed in the world by Rohm, Hitler, Moussolini, Mataxas, Franco and their ilk.

Henrygreen has also contended that the United States is much worse than Germany in terms of crimes against humanity, and by the absence of any other examples than Hitler, seems to suggest that this was the one misstep of the German peoples in all of their history. This is absurd, as well, and i will address this topic next.
 
 
A further significant basis for Henrygreen's obsessive hatred for the United States is his contention that the United States is guilty for crimes against humanity of a unique extent, for which it's destruction is the only reasonable remedy. Without considering the vast, almost incomprehensible horror of Stalinism, and leaving aside the question of Hitler, already discussed above, one would have to take such a position based on an interpretation of American history which i do not believe could be supported.

First, however, i would make some remarks about the inferential contention that the Germans only did a bad thing once, while Hitler was in power. This ignores the misery and strife visited on northern Italy for a more than a thousand years, beginning with the Babenberg emperors and their wars with the various Popes, and not ending finally until the bloody battles at Magenta and Solferino in 1859, when Napoleon III finally broke the back of Austrian military power in Italy. Without that campaign by the French, it is doubtful if Cavour and Garibaldi could have made successful revolution in Italy. This ignores the delightful practice of hunting Latts and Balts as though they were wild game, which was practiced by the Knights of the Teutonic Order for as long as they could make the justification that these peoples were pagans, and not christians. This position ignores the great misery visited on the Germans themselves, and many of their neighbors during the Wars of the Reformation and the Thirty Years War. This ignores the misery visited on Czechs, Germans, Austrians and Italians when Frederick II launched his preemptive invasion of Silesia in 1740, precipitating the War of the Austrian Succession. This ignores the two partitions of Poland, concerted by Russia, Prussia and Austria. This ignores the war with France in 1870, on a flimsy pretext, which also helped to set the stage for the First World War. The contention that any nation should be destroyed on the basis of past sins is not supportable in any pragmatic context-and is precisely why i opposed the war in Iraq. The more extravagant contention that the United States is worse throughout history than anyone else, is almost unbelievable. I've written these brief notices of German heavy-handedness both at home and among their neighbors throughout history in order to show that these things can be found in the history of any great nation, and not to belittle the Germans. Americans are no better than, and certainly no worse than, the Germans or any other European nation.
 
 
World War Startin' Tally

Germany: 2
America: None...yet (still ahead of the game)
 
 
I thought WWI was started by serbia or someone?

For my part - I think it's perfectly fine for mr. henry green to spout his angry expressions... <shrugs> as long as he's not being purposely lame.

stasia
 
 
 
The Germans have a 12 year history of genocide but have historically produced more geniuses in literature, philosophy, music, mathematics and science than about any country you could name.

America has a 200+ year history of genocide and has produced no one of any note.

America should be destroyed as a matter of global hygiene.
 

I've already taken notice of the desultory efforts of the Teutonic Order to exterminate the Latts and Balts, and other slavic peoples whom they accused of being pagan. There is a distinction to be made between committing genocide and attempting it. Hitler and his regime attempted it, and failed. There was not a concerted effort at genocide in the United States, and more Amerinds died at the hands of their fellow Amerinds and from diseases for which they had no resistance, than from direct military action by the United States. And these people survive today. I won't deny the great injustice and generations of warfare--that, however is a far cry from the almost Breughellian vision of twisted, gnomish figures of culturally benighted Americans working busilly at the forge to produce the weapons with which they hope to destroy mankind, the image which came to my incredulous mind when Henrygreen contended that Americans have and have had no cultural life and made no cultural contributions, while spending all their treasure on the sinews of war.

Henrygreen introduced the term genocide, and unless his view of American history is far more twisted than i am capable of imagining, he can only refer to the wars with the Amerinds. First, i would repeat that much of their population decline is attributable to the introduction of diseases for which they had no resistance. Specious and unsupportable AND unsupported claims about traders handing out blankets infected with smallpox have been made down through the years, and are foolish on the face of it. Those who traded with the Amerind had no reason to want the decline of the population of their customers, and a germ theory of disease and its spread were unknown in the eras referred to, no one would have known that they could spread disease through "infected" items. First and foremost, disease destroyed the populations of the aboriginal tribes of the Americas. In the second place, this position, quite a popular one, ignores what Amerinds did to one another. When Cartier siled the St. Lawrence valley in the 1530's, he recorded some of the vocabulary of the natives he met. Later scholars were able to show that these words came from the Huron-Iroquois language group. When Champlain arrived three generations later, the Iroquois had been pushed far to the south, to the Mohawk valley of what is now New York, by the relentless pressure of the Algonquian-speaking tribes. Champlain estalished good relations with the Ottawa, and when they asked him to accompany them on an expedition against their enemies, he agreed. They found a large Iroquois raiding party travelling north, and killed many and scattered the rest. The survivors never forgot, and a century and a half of warfare between the Iroquois Confederation and the French was precipitated.

The Jesuits sent missionaries among the Huron and the Algonquian tribes. They recorded, grimly, the beginning of the great wars by the Iroquois in 1640. The Iroquois had determined that they should exterminate the competition, and engross the entire fur trade out of the great lakes. They wiped out the Cat People, likely a sept of the Hurons, although we will never know, because the Jesuits had not yet recorded their language nor described their culture. They very nearly wiped out the Hurons, their own linguistic and cultural cousins. They drove the Potowatomie out of what is now Ohio and northern Indiana, until only a remnant remained in souther Indiana and in Illinois. In 1687, Henri Tonti, one of LaSalle's faithful Lieutenants, was travelling from Peoria back to Montreal. He stopped briefly to visit with the Illinois at their winter gathering site at what is now Starved Rock State Park in Illinois, and then crossed the river. Shortly after, encountered a war party of the Iroquois, who were intent on exterminating the Illinois. He went back to warn his friends, and then lead a party across the river to attack the Iroquois. This provided a set-back to their advance, and the Illinois improved upon the opportunity to gather their families and to retreat down the right bank of the Illinios river. The Iroquois crossed the river, desecrated the graves of the Illinois, and then, for no good reason, re-crossed the river, and paralelled the Illinois' march by moving down the left bank. When they reached the Mississippi, the Illinois crossed that river--all except the Tamaroa sept, which apparently believed they were now safe. The following morning, the Iroquois attacked. The warriors of the Tamaroa fled, and crossed the Mississippi to join the rest of the tribe. The old men, the women and children were all killed by the Iroquois, and the Tamaroa ceased to exist within a generation.

I've put this detail about the Iroquois in to point out that it was not just the English colonists who were a threat to the Amerinds, nor the French either. The Sioux were driven into Minnesota and the northern great plains by a similar attempt at extermination by the Ojibway. The last three centuries of American history are not so facile as though who contend the United States has practiced genocide would have people believe. The situation was complex, the justifications for government actions were not criticized in the "civilized world," including in Europe. Beethoven wrote a fair amount of good music (can't touch the production of Haydn and Mozart, but hey, he did ok) in the 1820's; i don't recall any protests on his part, or of any of the other "cultural giants" of Germany about the "Trail of Tears," or of any other such actions of the American government. It was a much different world than that which exists today, and the values of nations were considerably different as well.

Henrygreen's conention that no other nation can match Germany's cultural production is absurd on the face of it. To compare French and Italian composers unfavorably in comparison to the production of the German composers is an exercise in taste, not a statement of historical fact. In others of the fine arts, it is doubtful if any nation will ever match the output in opera of the Italians. There is no school of painting in Germany to match the centuries of fine art produced in Italy, France and in the Low countries. None of this is to say that the Germans did not produce fine art, simply that there is no basis for the statement that their production is superior in either amount or quality. The "feces-strewn pit" of the United States to which he refers has produced the Hudson River School of landscape artists, as well as many other painters of note, Jackson Pollock being the most recently example which comes readily to mind. Aaron Copeland and Leonard Bernstein are valued in Europe, and their works are played in Europe regularly, because the Europeans recognize the worth of their production. No nation has a corner on culture. If Henrygreen wants to prefer the German cultural contribution above all others, this is, once again, and exercise in taste. It does not justify a contention of German superiority, nor does it justify the vile things he says about America.
 
 
Stasia, some info, with a cool Blackadder reference too:

In Blackadder Goes Forth, Baldrick opined that the war began when 'Archie Duke shot an ostrich because he was hungry'. His garbled version of the assassination of Archduke Franz Ferdinand of Austria-Hungary reflects popular opinion: that the issues were not worth the ensuing bloodbath. Most modern scholars would not agree. Germany and Austria-Hungary (the Central Powers) are seen, at the very least, as creating the conditions for conflict. Some go much further, blaming Germany for planning and waging a deliberate war of aggression.

'Europe was divided into two armed camps: the Entente Powers and the Central Powers...'
Under Kaiser Wilhelm II, Germany moved from a policy of maintaining the status quo to a more aggressive stance. He decided against renewing a treaty with Russia, effectively opting for the Austrian alliance. Germany's western and eastern neighbours, France and Russia, signed an alliance in 1894 united by fear and resentment of Berlin. In 1898, Germany began to build up its navy, although this could only alarm the world's most powerful maritime nation, Britain. Recognising a major threat to her security, Britain abandoned the policy of holding aloof from entanglements with continental powers. Within ten years, Britain had concluded agreements, albeit limited, with her two major colonial rivals, France and Russia. Europe was divided into two armed camps: the Entente Powers and the Central Powers, and their populations began to see war not merely as inevitable but even welcome.

In the summer of 1914 the Germans were prepared, at the very least, to run the risk of causing a large-scale war. The crumbling Austro-Hungarian Empire decided, after the assassination on 28 June, to take action against Serbia, which was suspected of being behind the murder. The German government issued the so-called 'blank cheque' on 5-6 July, offering unconditional support to the Austrians, despite the risk of war with Russia. Germany, painted into a diplomatic corner by Wilhelm's bellicosity, saw this as a way of breaking up the Entente, for France and Britain might refuse to support Russia. Moreover, a wish to unite the nation behind the government may have been a motive. So might desire to strike against Russia before it had finished rebuilding its military strength after its defeat by Japan in 1905.
 
 
Thanks, cav! <smiles>
 
 
Setanta, thanks, I was just about to say that, and you saved me the trouble of writing it.

I liked the detail about the indians, always a favourite subject of mine. I am too old to learn to call them Native Americans, and Amerinds serves nicely.

I'm not going to get too exercised about henrygreen, but I think his stuff would sit better in a dedicated thread.

McT
 
 
Mapleleaf, i'd be interested to know: when you began this and the Frenchmen thread, did you have any idea of the scope of the eventual outcome?
 
 
 
I'm not going to get too exercised about henrygreen, but I think his stuff would sit better in a dedicated thread.
 

What name should such a thread bear? An exercise in haterd toward the USA? IMO, moderators could have pondered about relevance of Mr. Green's participation.
 
 
McTag, there is a work which you might be able to find in two volumes which could prove of interest to you. It is quite readable, entertaining, in fact. This is Francis Parkman's seven volume history of the French in North America. When reading this, keep in mind that he was a typical 19th century man, and considered the Amerinds to be filthy savages. This is one of those inexplicable, but common historical contradictions, because he had travelled the Oregon trail just after leaving university, and probably had more direct experience of the aboriginal natives than any other historian writing in America in that century. The writing style is quite lively, and should be read with salt cellar to hand--there is, for example an hilarious description of the wittily wicked Frederick II precipitating a European war through his insulting remarks about three women: la Maquise de Pompador, the effective manager of Louis XV's government, Maria Theresa and the Empress Elizabeth of Russia. Of course, there was a great deal more than that involved, but the passage is quite entertaining. I think you'd like it.
 
 
steissd, henrygreen is a agry person who brings another side to the debates about the US. He is free to express his anger just as long as he refrains from personal attacks. I don't always agree with him, but I can respect his ideas expressed in whatever manner he feels the need - as long as he stays on subject. c.i.
 
 
Having dismissed my remarks as psychotic, sentana goes about a lengthy, multi-post effort to rebut them. He takes a long time to get started--at least 3/4ths of his opening gambit is totally hollow invective. The remainder of his historical reconaissance is accurate enough, though it willfully distorts the points I made.

I never insisted Germany was the most creative country on earth--only that their achievements in literature, science, philosophy and music leave the dreadful United States completely and utterly in the shade.

The cottage industry in germany-bashing for the sins of the holocaust does INDEED continue apace while the repulsive leadership of the American Nazi state glorifies our bloodbath in indochina to this day.

While the Germans have paid billions in restitution to their victims, the United States laughs at its victims of murder and orchestrated torture, refusing so much as an apology for the millions incinerated in Vietnam, Cambodia and Laos (let alone Chile, Nicaragua, Honduras, el salvador, Iran, Afghanistan, Iraq, etc), or the Africans it kept shackled together in order to build this ludicrous and debased country.

There are monuments to the war resistance in every city in germany. Such a thing would be unthinkable in our own militarized pigsty where those refusing participation in our slaughter of the "gooks" are still considered criminals. Reagan referred to Vietnam as "a noble cause" The equivalent would be gerhard schroder calling Auschwitz "a fine idea" --pretty unthinkable, if you ask me.

The main difference between the German Nazis and the American Nazis is that the former faced credible opposition to their tyranny which in fact, defeated them in the end. No such opposition exists today to check the bloody progress of "the last remaining superpower." The implications of this are obvious to anyone following the news.
 
 
 
 
Setana,
No, I had no idea what direction this interaction would take. However, after being a participant on Abuzz, I understand how wide open threads can be in a free society. If those of you who disagree with henrygreen would interact with one another and not him, we could move on to other things. Then again, if you feel he has broken the guidelines of A2K, you should contact Jes or Craven.

It is unfortunate that such ill will has been stirred by mere words. Still, it reminds us of the power of language, be it good or ill.
 
 
Many in this country are unawares, but the Germans introduced education and music to this country. All cultures have strengths and weaknesses in our history; nit-picking one or two generations doesn't do it justice. c.i.
 
 
If I remember well, President Dwight D. Eisenhower was of German origin.
 
 
Action has been taken against member henrygreen for violating Section III B of the Terms of Service. We take threats of physical harm very seriously. Thank you to all who reported this user's comments.
 
 
By the most recent data of which i have heard, the Germans now represent the largest single immigrant group in the United States. The Germans in Pennsylvania at the time of the French and Indian War (1754--1763), were from pacifist traditions, and would not fight. By contrast, the Germans in Missouri in 1861, lead by the charismatic Franz Sigel, moved quickly to secure the Federal Arsenal in St. Louis, a hot-bed of Confederate sympathy. Later, although Sigel ruined his own career eventually, he served faithfully as a brigade and then division commander, and German soldiers in the Federal armies would proudly say: "I fights mit Sigel!" During the first world war, the National Guard from Wisconsin contained so many Americans born in Germany, or raised by their immigrant parents in German-speaking households, that they were able to wreak havoc by calling out to Germans during firefights, or by speaking German "in code" on American telephone lines, which were being tapped by the Germans. At one point, one of their battalions formed up in column and marched into the German lines singing favorite German marching songs, and were ignored until it was too late--they managed to capture a German regimental headquarters and hundreds of troops.

Of course, i am criminally remiss in not noticing the cultural contribution of Germans in America, but that's one of my more glaringly obvious faults. I just wanted to take notice that Germans in our history have been different kinds of citizens, and have all made their contributions.
 
 
My thanks to all of you for our transition through the henrygreen situation. As I say to my wife, and she to me, you did good.

I need to reread this thread. Probably, with the history site in one window and this thread on the other. Lots to integrate into my increasingly befuddled mind.
 
 
Maple, it will help you to understand the thread better if you skip over my posts  

Hey, I feel a bit sorry for Henry now. What was that about physical threats? I wasn't aware of any.
He obviously believed in what he was saying, however unpalatable his views, and his way of presenting them.
 
 
He said that one of our members should be taken out and shot... at any event, that's the post i believe got him canned...
 
 
That would do it...good riddance.
 
 
I didn't interpret it as a direct threat. Henry was talking about a member of the forum with whom he disagreed. The guy is an Iraq war vet who just returned minus two fingers. Henry wrote: "Frankly, a bullet is too good for such a person." Direct or indirect, such a comment is clearly over the line in my book. I'm glad the moderator called him on it.
 
 
ci - how did the germans introduce education to america?

stasia
 
 
Dear Moderator, It's one thing to "We take threats of physical harm very seriously," but another to actualize it. We are all anonymous persona on A2K; most of the people do not know where another lives. Some people now know where Rae and Ashman lives, but I doubt very much those folks are in any danger - not any more so than the man on the street. I still think it was a "over-reaction" to ban henrygreen. That's my humble opinion. c.i.
 
 
 
ci - how did the germans introduce education to america?

stasia
 

Yeah, Boss, i know what you mean... the Germans introduced education and music to this country ? ! ? ! ? I thought that was out there myself, but i guess i didn't wanna be the first to say it...
 
 
anastasia, I just remember reading a book by a black Stanford professor on the subject of the different cultures that make up the US; their contributions, history of immigration, eocnomics, and other interesting info. I tried a quick Google search, but could nothing. I'll continue my search, but can't promise anything. c.i.
 
 
<g> no - I was just wondering, maybe you meant universities or something. I'm sure the pilgrims brought a teacher?

stasia
 
 
I find it rather difficult to associate in my mind either Harvard University or Yale with the Germans.
 
 
"Yale," from the Low German word for "blue-blooded nepotism." Or is that "Dartmouth"? I can never keep my old German straight...
 
 
Plat Deutch, low German, don't get no lower than when you hear it spoken in the shrubbery...
 
 
oooh, that's good.
 
 
 
 
 
Don't fret Lovey, it's a slur against shrubbery... you know, Bushes
 
 
still not nice  
 
 
When you decide to take offense, even where none was meant, there's just no stoppin' you, is there?

Seeyabye
 
 
i'd've thunk the language of sappho was the only one for those occasions...
 
 
You may wish to participate in the following thread devoted to the henrygreen situation:  ACTION HAS BEEN TAKEN AGAINST MEMBER henrygreen 
 
 
Even though I posted my total support for dismissing henrygreen in that thread, I am still more interested in discussing Sapphic rites here....  
 
 
Mr Green did make specific threats against MysteryMan in another thread - I think they have also been pulled. CI - I'd just like to point out that he'd been on for about a week and it was out of hand. He can go over to ABUZZ if he wants to indulge that sort of behaviour.
 
 
Setanta, you reckon the family name was originally "Busch"?
 
 
Mr Still, I must've missed those 'specific threats against MysteryMan.' What I saw in henrygreen was a somewhat irrational, angry, individual, with an above average ability to vocalize very succinctly the inhumanity of Germans and Americans - harboring on obsession. As for personal invectives, I saw some from him, and some from other participants, but nothing that bordered on banishment. Understanding his anger, I would not have taken any threats from him as a 'real' threat. After all, he seeks the total destruction of the US for the sins of the few; not very rational in my mind. I also saw his ability to rankle people. I just thought he brought another extreme side to our discussion, and never felt threatened by him. c.i.
 
 
Firstly, Having read thru most of this thread, I think HenryPuke should be submitted as a one man guinea pig too see what really happens when Armageddon gets here.
Secondly, Why is he hiding his nationality and the country he lives in.
Thirdly, I as a Brit feel I have not been treated fairly by Henry, he hasn't, as far as I can see slagged off the UK once and we've killed, raped, pillaged and plundered the planet on a wholesale basis. But then perhaps Henry is a myopic Brit and has his dick stuck up his own backside.
 
 
Don't keep it all pent up inside, OAK, tell us how you really feel...
 
 
I'll lay you 10 to 1 henry's an Amreekan...
 
 
OK Setanta, getting down to the nuts and bolts here. Getting our hands a bit grubby and our knees bronzed by the Equatorial sun, I think Henry should be pegged out in the desert sun and licked to death by stray dogs and camels, whilst naked women dance a highland fling round and round him.
 
 
watch out, oldandknew... <g> you're not supposed to do that...

stasia
 
 
Ah, stasia. It just a merry jape, mad dogs and Englishmen and all that.
 
 
Stasia is right, the conversation about an unnamed ex-member is officially off-limits, and the reasons were well stated by CDK, and I go with the reasons given, especially regarding said ex-member's right to privacy, and to not being tortured in a public forum.

This thread should return to it's original goal, making fun of Germans....okay, satirizing cultural stereotypes  
 
 
I disagree, and will go to the thread on that topic to say as much...
 
 
Fine by me Setanta, but you can still make fun of Germans here, I hope  
 
 
I need to tread lightly, Boss, Lovey's M & P are German, an' i do believe i've already put my foot in it in this thread on that account...
 
 
I have raised the white flag. I am ready to move on.
 
 
Ahhhhh, you must be French.

(Joke! Joke! I love the French! In fact, I should have said Italian!

Oops........)
 
 
Actually, i believe smurfs were the creation of a Belgian artist, Boss...
 
 
yes the smurfs are belgian, the french brought us Astrix the Gaul and TinTin and the Brits brought football hooligans, curry and the Sun Newspaper.
 
 
I always found Asterix and Obelix to be high-larious... they poked fun at all of the other Europeans by using the stereotypes, and ridiculed the stereotypes in the process...

In Asterix chez les Helvetiens, there was one poor sod who was always trying to get his floor mopped, and Asterix and Obelix, naturally, kept tracking mud across the floor just as he would finish it... great comic relief, and a nice little dig at the Swiss obsession with cleanliness...
 
 
OAK,
I just read your Groucho Marx quote...<snicker>...I needed that!
 
 
I like the Asterix stories as well, great fun. Almost contempory in an historic setting.

Mapel --- I saw it on a retailers bag a whiles back, so i thought i'd borrow it
 
 
So Smurfs don't represent Krishna?
 
 
Hey -- please take your blue humor to another forum.
 
 
the smurfs at one time represented a gas company in ye olde worlde of Yourope before the burning bush was kindled and the blair UK project surfaced
 
 
OAK, technically, the British brought us bastardized crappy curry, and chicken tikka masala....an invention of Indian cooks working in England, based on a perfectly adequate tandoori dish, but the Brits insisted on having sauce on it...and, lest we forget, the Germans brought us lager....
 
 
Lager, schmager. The Brits brought us a universe of ales...
 
 
Yeah, but the Germans learned how to refrigerate them....and as far as I know, most North Americans prefer cold beer, even ale.
 
 
I take it any which way.

Used to drink tons of steam beer, but no one's got it on tap here and it's way too expensive in the bottle.
 
 
Yes guys, we Brits are responsible for any number of both good and bad cultural products. We have thru our Indian cousins invented 2nd generation curries and by own hands we have brewed thousands of different ales.

Love us or hate us, we Brits have enhanced or ruined millions of lives around the world. We've dealt in gold bullion and millstones, and we've given the world it's true international language.
 
 
I thought the Normans started that global language thingy...
 
 
Two notes here...

The American language became the international lingua france in the 1950's--decry how they would the "Ugly American," them boys and girls weren't late for their appointments with the investment capital crowd or the factory site survey team; this was reinforced by a strong move on the part of the West Germans after 1955, when they used the "economic miracle" (hmm, half-a-million G.I.'s, plus almost another half-a-million Brits, Dutch and Belgians, and no army of their own to pay for... miracle?) as a springboard to export their products, their technology and their technicians around the world--Krupp set the bar high by going out to sell entire streel prouction plants, on the location of your choice, price on a sliding scale dependant upon how quickly you wanted it built, and how good your government's credit was--and they were speaking the American language, because they understood that this was an advantage to both German and Yankee in the international development gold rush.

The second point is about the refrigeration of beer, ale, porter, etc. In 1875, an economic depression hit Europe without warning (no economic indicator statistics, no securities watchdog agencies, no computerized currency exchanges--they really didn't see it coming), and it lasted for almost 20 years. America suffered a little from the loss of raw materials exports to Europe, but the human imports just kept right on comin' from the various "Old Countries," and that gave many European businesses pause to consider. European investors began coming to the U.S. to find investment opportunities (thereby indirectly increasing U.S. imports of European goods, which contributed to a very slow recovery in Europe).

The biggest impact was on the beer business in the United States. That's right, i said beer. Southeast Missouri has so many caves, the end of civilization as we know would not cause homelessness there. The interiors of these caves remain in the 40-50 degrees Farenheit range all year long. Big British and German brewing conglomerates duked it out in St. Louis for the lucrative and constantly growing beer market in the U.S. The St. Louis area and the wesern portion of southern Illinois are home to huge German communities, and both area were filled with small brewers, often selling beer and ale made to recipes already known to be popular to the German communities there. Most of these got run out of business, all but Griesedich (that's right, greasy dick -- had the broadcast concession at the Cardinals ballpark locked up so tight, they kept it even after Budwieser bought the park) and Anheuser's. Anheuser had established the Bavarian brewery before the civil war. Another guy shows up just at the beginning of the war--Adolphus Busch. In 1861, Franz Sigel lead German militia, who were not a part of the pro-Confederate Missouri State Guard, into St. Louis to secure the Federal Arsenal. The southern-sympathizing members of St. Louis were, for about a decade, out of power, and the Germans moved right in. Adolphus Busch was not behind hand, he married Lilly Anheuser. Seems the old man wasn't to thrilled, but he caved in and hired the boy in 1864. In 1869, Adolphus proved he'd learned, and please his father-in-law by introducing an instantly popular new brand--Budweiser. Budevice (Budwies in German) is in Bohemia (Czech Republick today), and the Budwieser produced there was considered to be the best in Europe--it was the "official" beer or more Royal and Ducal families in Europe than any other. They called it "the Beer of Kings." Knowing his clientele, Adolphus initially produced a high quality lager with a Bohemian flavor, and called his "the King of Beers." (Don't know what happened in the interim, they probably used Prohibition as the means to cheapen the recipe, and produce the swill which is now bottled under that name.) He convinced the now aged Anheuser that they should dip as deeply as possible into their credit resources and buy out as many small brewers as possible. The Brits and the Germans got in, but they got nothing like the market share they had expected.

And one further result--with the death of so many small breweries which had shipped to German communities all over the United States, smart brewers in the countrie's largest German-speaking area were quick to take advantge of their positioning, and grab up market share in those communities--and that meant the dramatic transformation of the brewing industry in Milwaukee.

ok, bullshit's over, as you were...
 
 
Man, if Setanta had been my high school history teacher, I would have paid way more attention....it seems that Bud is also King of Beers among the youngsters in Ireland as well. When the wife and I honeymooned there, we were floored by this fact....what with all the good Guinness and Murphys about...
 
 
Oh man, Murphy's Stout is the crème de la crème of porters... that's just disgustin'... i really didn't want to know that...
 
 
Budweiser is brewed in the UK. People drink it cos it's fashionable, easy to drink and has very little taste. Porter and ale you need to learn too drink and appreciate.
 
 
 
Budweiser is brewed in the UK. People drink it cos it's fashionable, easy to drink and has very little taste. Porter and ale you need to learn too drink and appreciate.
 

When i was very small, my grandfather still occassionally took strong drink. My sister and i (we're one year apart) would each take hold of the bail of an old-fashioned tapped-beer pail, and go to Casey's to get his porter. When we got home, he'd let us sip the head off the contents of the tin before he filled the pitcher. The first time i tasted American lager, although i kept my mouth shut because i didn't want to appear uncool, my immediate thougth was: "Who pissed in my bottle?"
 
 
Hmmm. Me own dear da' would give me nips of his bumbling home brew when I was a wee lad (or words to that effect), so that when I had American mass-market pils-piss I thought it was wonderful...
 
 
Set, And we're all sure you know how piss tastes.   c.i.
 
 
I've a friend who is part owner in a vinyard, and takes his portion of the proceeds in kind. He then makes about 120-160 gallons of wine each year, for family and friends. It's not bad, but i'm no judge--one red wine glass full will make me badly ill for days. But he and i got some dark molasses one year, and some dark, hopped-barly malt, and made our own ale. I was shooting for something similar to Smithwick's, the once famous red beer of Kilkenny (i've heard they declined or went out of busines or summat). I may not have achieved that, but we got a very palatable ale, with one proviso. It ran 9 to 13 % alcohol per batch, and even the blending process of all the 5 gallon containers only reduced the alcohol content to between 10 and 11 %. Two quarts of that, and you can forget about going out for the evening.
 
 
It's that molasses what done it. You start adding sugars beyond what you have in the malts and you start getting into strong ale territory. Made a very, very light brew one summer with pale malt, tossed in some ginger to give it a spicy bite, and spike it with a bunch of plain old sugar. What I got wasn't beer, but it sure did change some of those summer afternoons.
 
 
Well, we did the whole "natural" brewing schtick... we "kreuzened" it (what the English and Irish call "charging" the brew) by taking three gallons of the brew, equally from all containers (they had been brewed separately, and the enthusiasm of the brewers yeast combined with the not terribly but still significant errors in our measuring made for differences in alcohol content--when you do 100 gallons in five gallon containers, quality control assumes a whole new meaning), and we then added five pounds each of the original mollasses (sp?... for dog's sake, someone tell me how to spell the word, and put me out of your misery... ) and the barley malt into ten gallons of water, and then added the first brewing beer. Bringing that to a boil, we then set it aside to cool until it was still hot, but not sufficiently to kill the active yeast in each of the jeriboms (can't spell that one, either). The product was divided equally, and returned to the five-gallons whatsits, and then kept in a walk-in at 45 degrees for four months. This obviated the need to add carbonation, and it meant that it continued to brew and age in the pint and quart bottles after it was finally poured off. (You know, when you can see the yeast settle in the bottom of your unpasteurized beer?) Two years down the road, you could get a contact buzz by opening a bottle and sitting next to it.
 
 
Damn, you kids make big batches. Mmmmmmm, and a sunny afternoon waiting for me out there....
 
 
Set, You know how to tell a tall ale.   c.i.
 
 
heeheeheeheeheehee...
 
 
I do not understand Setanta.
No human brain can physically contain that many facts. :wink:
I am beginning to hypothesize that "he" is actually a multinational conglomerate of researchers and specialists, hired for the purpose of conducting subtle educational experiments upon the residents of A2K.
But I will need more data. Researching...
 
 
we are not...

: p [/b][/color]
 
 
Ah... Denial is always the first indication of what is true...
 
 
Well, stout, both Murphy's and Guinness generally runs about 4-4.5% alcohol....it only tastes strong, maybe it's all the iron in it  
 
 
cav, It's really all the Irish jokes in the beer that tastes strong.   c.i.
 
 
Ahh, true enough c.i. When the wife and I were in West Cork, we loved hanging out with the ould ones, just listening to their stories and having great conversations. We avoided the big towns, and spent our time in the country. They even discussed politics, except when Brit tourists entered the pub. Murphy's is the stout of choice in Cork, and Guinness is for the tourists. It was quite amusing to us that they took such care (10 minutes at least) to draw a pint of Murphy's, and about 10 seconds to draw a Guinness.
 
 
cav, There's a Murphy's pub on every block in Ireland. Didn't know they named their pubs after the beer. LOL BTW, even saw a Bill Clinton pub. Shud'a took a picture of that one! c.i.
 
 
Holy cow, I would have loved to see that pic   In Toronto, there is a Guinness pub on every corner!
 
 
cav, I learned one thing on my visit to Ireland: Murphy means "sea warrior." Don't ask what else happend, but "Guinness" seems to be prominent.   c.i.
 
 
Ya know, CI, it's funny you say that. When I was in Ireland, one of those along (a daughter of a friend of the gf's family) would say, in all seriousness, in every town we came across, "Let's go to Murphy's" or "Let's go to Guinness." The longest short trip of my life...
 
 
VIVE LE REVOLUTION ! so what's a little inconvenience; life will go on tomorrow! i admire the french for their spunk - in canada we could use some of their rabble-rousing spirit. but here we must be polite and NOT inconvenience anyone; i say "the heck with it, and let's go on the barricades"!........ i'm getting a little late into this thread and wonder how we got from "understanding germans" to murphy and the french? i'll throw in a few little scraps and hope the thread will get back on track. i've got mapleleaf's comments in front of me and i'll put in my comments and perhaps add a few little tidbits. "INDUSTRIOUS" - germans are getting some of the longest vacations - and the last volkswagen i drove(a 1972 passat made in germany) gave up it's ghost after seven years and less than 120,000 miles. the old beetles would run and run with little maintenance.... "A WAR LIKE PEOPLE" - we spent three weeks in hamburg/germany in march/april 2003 and i think we saw more anti-war demonstrations in that short time than we've had in canada in the last ten years - certainly the young people would not qualify as war-like people. "BLOND HAIR AND BLUE EYES" -well, there are a few of those left - but i think most have black/brown hair.... more later(i'm not very industrious right now).hbg
 
 
Hamburger, you're German, and we, here at A2K, don't want expert opinion, we'd rather make it up as we go along. By all means, though, be sure to post more of your comments. We likely, however, won't stay on topic. I will, especially, be prone to straying if i see the prospect of a cheap joke...
 
 
setanta: i'm sure you know how much i love getting off the subject - but surely that doesn't give everyone else the same right, RIGHT ? "BLOND HAIR AND BLUE EYES" (once more) : germany has been a mixture of of many different peoples/races for centuries and one would perhaps find enclaves of (somewhat) true germans more likely in the united states and canada than in germany. some years ago we travelled for a few weeks through texas and came across a german settlement dating back to about 1850(the settlers had come over after the german revolution of 1848). i believe the town/village was called BRAUNFELS(can't find it on a map); they are well known for their annual WURSTFEST. the people spoke better german than we did(well, that may really mean that our german is pretty lousy). they seemed to have maintained a real german identity; the mexican waitress at the local restauraunt also spoke pretty good german; which, she told us, was being taught at school. we were really quite astonished to be addressed in perfect german by the ladies running the local museum. i'm certainly a mixture of many different races, i'm sure. no blond hair, no blue eyes! father's family came from eastern part of germany(pomerania); mother's family came from the rhineland and to top it of there apparently is a shot of gypsy blood in my veins(my grand-dad was known as "ZIGEUNER"(gypsy) by his friends. my brother who liked to wear a mustache(a la menjou) was sometimes mistaken for an italian. we certainly are a good mixture(just like ebeth's dogs - no disrespect to bailey and cleo!). "BLACK FOREST" : it's a nice area of germany, but give me the forests of northern ontario or the adirondacks; those are FORESTS! (same goes for SCHWARZWAELDER KIRSCHTORTE - BLACKFOREST CAKE - i'd take a pecan pie or new york cheese cake!)............. but there are some german foods(they may be found in hamburg and surrounding area) that are sure to delight any lover of good food; i'll list just a few here(details supplied on request) : sweet-and-sour eel soup(that's right : EEL), BOHNEN, BIRNEN UND SPECK(green beans, fresh sweet pears and smoked bacon), SNUTEN UN POOTEN(pigs' snouts and trotters with sauerkraut and puree of yellow peas), and finally LABSKAUS( a stew of day-old potatoes and saltbeef served with red beets and salted herring. enough for now. hbg
 
 
Hamburger (whew, i almost used yer real moniker), if the Braunfels to which you refer is near to San Antonio, as in New Braunfels, it's still there, but it's been absorbed by the dramatic growth of the city in the era of the Vietnam War.
 
 
hbg, There are also many Germans in South America. Puerto Montt in Chile has a well known German community. When I went on my cruise last November to South America, our ship had many Germans on it. One day at lunch, I sat with a couple from Germany, and asked if it was okay to ask them a question. I asked if the people from Germany or they had family in Puerto Montt, but he answered in the negative. He told me that the reason so many Germans were on the Celebrity Cruise was that they advertised extensively in Germany. He also offered that he was a captain on a ship, and traveled all over the world, but never went around Cape Horn. He said this trip was his life's dream. c.i.
 
 
i need some help in understanding germans.
setanta: THANKS ! of course it was NEW braunfels. i understand you posted a thread re. st. petersburg anniversary, but i can't find it. here is a link you may find of interest re. the just(today) opened new AMBERROOM :  www.tzar.ru . another neat site is  www.grandhotel.com .well, if you blow my cover i hope i'll survive it. hbg
 
 
c.i. : i was told that family from my mother's side shipped out to south america - chile, i believe - but i don't know any details. an interesting book about south america with many references to german settlers is john gunther's "INSIDE LATIN AMERICA". while it is somewhat outdated(having been published in 1940) i still enjoy browsing through it(and having the german settlers referred to as "FIFTH COLUMN"). hamburg was and is an important german and european shipping port connecting europe to south-america. hamburg has always had strong trade connections to south-america; a shipping line named HAMBURG-SUED maintains today a busy schedule to south-america - they had some of the most beautiful german passenger-ships before the war; they all had names starting with CAP...(cap arcona was the most famous one; i still remember it being berthed right on the hamburg waterfront - what a sight it was!). hbg
 
 
c.i. : have been trying to copy a picture of the ship to the thread - without success! the "crtl" and "c" don.t seem to do the trick - so i'm giving you the address, in case you are interested looking at it (a.t. one of the sites it was called "the most beautiful ship of its times)" :  www.deutsche-passagierschiffe.de/arcona.htm  hbg
 
 
hbg, It is a beautiful ship! When I first looked at it, it resembled the Queen Mary - that ventage. I think they're going to retire the Queen Mary II this year. BTW, on my visit to Russia a few years ago, I was able to see the Amber Room. It was so awesome, I thought it the most beautiful room in the world, and I've seen some beautiful buildings in my time. On our visit to Cahterine the Great's Palace, we were told the story about the Amber Room; the Russian deconstructed the Amber Room and shipped it to Siberia for safe keeping during the war. We were also informed that Germany helped with the cost of reconstruction. c.i.
 
 
Forgive me for not reading through the entire thread.....

Three of my dearest friends are from Germany.

One, I'm afraid, doesn't keep in touch with me anymore and this saddens me endlessly.

But.....

He was punctual beyond belief. Relaxed enough though that he didn't get out of sorts when things didn't go according to plan. (If you're reading this Mathias, I still love you to pieces and miss you terribly.)

Stefan and Ursula ~ now, they are two people who defy all statistics. Ursula is German, Stefan is Swedish ~ together or seperately, they are great people. I'm proud to call them friends.
 
 
By the way, Hamburger, in addition to the German Village neighborhood in Columbus with its famous sausage maker, Schmidt's, there is a large ethnic German community in southern Illinois, and in southeast Missouri, and there is a town in Illinois (the name escapes me at the moment) in which they have a bratwurst festival every year. Good thing i don't live too close to that anymore--i eat too many sausages as it is.

Also, i don't know if you were told, but Mr. Bailey has evinced a distinct dislike for German poetry. Lovey and i were sitting in Schiller park, near the statue of Schiller, in German Village, having just read all of the quotes they have inscribed in the walks. Mr. Bailey jumped up to join us, but just as he settled in, he happened to look up at the statue of Schiller, and began to bark in a very indignant manner. I can't think what his objection would be, especially as he is part Pomeranian himself, but, then, i'm not terribly familiar with German poetry.
 
 
c.i. : a/t the magazine DEUTSCHLAND (german government puplication) the original amber room was removed by the german army during the war and transported to a mine-shaft used as storage by the university of goettingen - the mine-shaft was also used to store ammo and blew up towards the end of the war - no more amber room! the new one (which opened today - chancellor schroeder and president putin in attendance) is a REPLICA. i have to supply the details tomorrow; it's a lengthy article. hbg
 
 
Here ya go, Boss:

 
 
 
Here's how i did that Hamburger:

I went to the web site you posted, and hovering over the picture, i "right-clicked" it, and got a drop-down menu. At the bottom of the drop-down menu is the word "Properties." Clicking that word produced another page which gives a technical description of the picture, and about half-way down is "Address," which lists the URL of the picture. Holding down the left mouse button, i dragged it over the address to highlight, and then pointed to the highlighted area, and righ-clicked. This produces a small drop-down menu, from which i selected "copy," which copies that highlighted portion to your "clipboard."

Then i came back to this site, and this thread, and typed: "[IMG]" which is UBB code for "open the insert picture option," i then right-clicked immediately behind the last bracket (leaving no space) and selected "paste" from the drop-down menu, which copied the address of the picture from my clipboard to the "reply window" in which i was typing. I then typed "[/IMG]" immediately after that address, leaving no space, which is UBB code for "close the insert picutre option." When i hit "submit" for the reply, it puts my text on the page, but not the UBB code, rather, it puts the picture there.
 
 
Here's how that looks when i disable the UBB code in this post:

 

Typing that with the UBB code enabled produces the picture in the text of your post. UBB code is enabled by default, so you don't have to worry about that when posting a picture.
 
 
hbg, You mean to tell me that all these years, I've lived with the wrong information on the Amber Room? How disheartening! c.i.
 
 
When you want to read (and see) more about the amber room, have a look at this website of the company, which financed the reconstruction:
 The Amber Room 

(I've seen the miniature version of this room some time ago. You can do so as well:

 Museum of Miniatures Berlin 
 
 
Walter, As always, Thank You, Sir Walter! However disappointed I am about the information provided us when we viewed the Amber Room, I'm still elated to have seen it during reconstruction. It shoud be considered one of the major wonders of the world. c.i.
 
 
Walter, I very much like the miniatures. As to the Amber Room itself - yes, it is absolutely amazing. I am glad they reconstructed it.

Rae     Love you too!
 
 
here is the german government press release re. AMBER ROOM (i have to break it down since i'm too DUMM(stupid) to do it in one run. hbg........."Eighth Wonder of the World" ablaze in all its glory once more

On 31 May 2003, to conclude the tercentenary celebrations of the city of St Petersburg, Russian President Putin and Chancellor Schröder will ceremonially open to the public the legendary Amber Room. From 2 June, visitors to the Great Catherine Palace will be able to experience it for themselves. This work of art, so beautiful that it was famed as "the eighth wonder of the world", has a long history. In 1716, the Prussian King Wilhelm I presented the Russian Tsar Peter I with a gift of several amber panels. Andreas Schlüter had created them. In return, the King of Prussia is said to have been given 55 "Giant Grenadiers" for his Palace Guard. The panels were housed in the Tsar's Winter Palace, the present-day Hermitage. Rastrelli, Catherine the Great's court architect, brought them all together in 1755 to create a room completely lined with amber in the Summer Palace at Tsarskoye Selo. The room is the only one of its kind in the history of art. Rastrelli completed the amber panels by adding precious mosaics showing allegorical themes.
 
 
AMBER ROOM - PART 2 German troops stole the Amber Room in the Second World War. The last time it was seen was in 1945 in the dungeons of Königsberg Castle (present-day Kaliningrad). Then all trace of it is lost. Bizarre theories and all sorts of imaginative adventure stories are wound up with the whereabouts of this room. Just where are the oak panels mounted with their pieces of amber? Where did the odyssey of the most famous art theft of the Nazi period come to an end? Despite the most intensive research, the room was never found.

The Soviet Union had already begun work on the reconstruction of the Amber Room in the 1980s. But it was only the 3.5 million dollars which Ruhrgas AG, as exclusive sponsor, provided for the completion of the project which enabled the work to be finished in time for the tercentenary year 2003. Some 50 restorers cut half a million small plates of amber to reproduce the wall panels. In the process, around six tonnes of the fossilised resin were used. A mosaic and a bureau which originally came from the Amber Room were returned to the palace from German private collections in the year 2000.
 
 
AMBER ROOM - PART 3 "Until now, the Amber Room was a symbol of the dark days of the Second World War. But as from today it is a clear, bright symbol of the good relationship between Russia and Germany", said Russian Minister of Culture, Michail Schwydkoi, on 17 May, the day on which the reconstruction work officially ended.
.............................................................................................. hope i haven't broken any rules here. one more entry on this subject follows. hbg
 
 
At least the part that Germany helped with the reconstruction was true!   c.i.
 
 
c.i. : yes, sorry to disappoint you! my wife(coming from a town very near to koenigsberg) was quite surprised and had a hard time believing it - shows you how fact and fiction get mixed up.( please see note to walter). walter : a quite interesting article with lavish illustrations appears in the magazine DEUTSCHLAND (issue : E 5 No. 2/2003 April/May) which we receive courtesy of the german government; it is published by Societaets-Verlag, Frankfurt am Main. the web address is given as  www.magazine-deutschland.de , but i cannot find it on the web; even tried the DEUTSCHLAND search machines - no luck. we have received the magazine for the last several years and it's not some obscure magazine. can you help find it ? don't know if there is perhaps already an overload of info on the amber room; just thought the address for anyone wanting to look at the illustratios might be in order. thanks! hbg
 
 
setanta : thanks for your help and "how-to" instructions! gives me something new to practice...... re. schiller-monument and master bailey : i quite agree with bailey; schiller was never my favourite germam poet/writer - just a little too dramatic for my taste (cleo - being more of a warrior type when she bares her teeth and growls might pwerhaps identify a little more with mr. schiller). i am more comfortable with someone like heinrich heine; just a little mor subtle. hbg
 
 
"I need some help in understanding Germans."

Mapleleaf, I'm late getting to this thread, but I read all the posts and have some differences of opinion and further information.

It takes a wild stretch of the imagination to blame France for WWII. Most German historians agree that anti-Semitism was at the core of Hitler's ideology. Hitler put his ideas in his book "Mein Kampf"(My Struggle) in 1923 and became quite rich off the sales. The book contained everything he believed - Nationalism, anti-Bolshevism, and anti-Semitism. He wrote that Jews were bacilli, racial tuberculosis, and should be annihilated. Slavs were to be used as slaves. Jews were blamed for every conceivable ill. They were the embodiment of capitalism, anarchism, communism, and social problems including lesbianism, homosexuality, smoking by women and the incidence of abortion(abortion was a capital crime in the Third Reich.

In 1933, Jews constituted only 2% of the German population.

The fanatical and irrational nature of Nazi anti-Semitism can be observed by the fact that the death camps were operating up to the end of the war during a time when
there was a pressing need for freight space, supplies and personnel.
---------
Science: In "The 12-Year Reich", Grunberger has a chapter on education in that time. The "whole child" should be developed. There was a very strong emphasis on sports. Jewish ideas and Jewish science were thrown out.

As for Nazism, the Swastika is an ancient east Indian symbol. Hitler and his circle believed in reincarnation. Herr Goebbels believed he was Henry the Fowler!
 
 
The Nazi Swastika and the Indian symbol face in opposite directions. c.i.
 
 
The foreward to Anatomy of the SS State provides a help to understanding Nazism. There are two predominant views of the Third Reich.

The first view sums it up with the word Auschwitz and does not go beyond the stark fact that it happened. How and why it happened is answered with generalized moral and cultural philosophising and leaves out the intellectual and political background.

The second view sees the events as the crimes of a misguided body of men who had no place in the main stream of German history of the period.

Both views lack insight and fail to see the connection between the form of politcal tyranny adopted and the mass crime called for by its idiology.
 
 
hamburger

I couldn't find any online version of 'Deutschland', neither on the Presse- and Indormationsamt page nor at the Societäts-Verlag (there website isn't online in the moment, it seems).
 
 
CICERONE,

Thanks, I never knew that or noticed that (regarding the swastica)
 
 
